New York, session 2025-2026, S8491.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (j) of subdivision 12 of section 66 of the public 2 service law, as amended by chapter 154 of the laws of 1989, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 (j) The schedule, rates, charges, form of contract or agreement, rule, 5 regulation, service, general privilege or facility in force when the new 6 schedule, rate, charge, form of contract, rule, regulation, service, 7 general privilege or facility was filed shall continue in force during 8 the period of the suspension unless the commission shall establish a 9 temporary rate or charge as authorized by section seventy-two of this 10 article. Provided, however, that whenever the commission shall deny a 11 request by a utility for a major change in rates or charges, the sched- 12 ule, rate, charge, form of contract or agreement, rule, regulation, 13 general privilege, facility, or service immediately in effect prior to 14 such request being filed shall remain in full force and effect until 15 such time as the commission approves a new schedule of rates or charges, 16 unless the commission established a temporary rate or charge as author- 17 ized by section seventy-two of this article. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 19 requests by a utility for a major change in rates or charges filed after 20 such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05472-03-6